Florida, session 2026, SB510.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 25 26 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 27 1004.04, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 28 1004.04âPublic accountability and state approval for 29 teacher preparation programs.â 30 (2)âUNIFORM CORE CURRICULA AND CANDIDATE ASSESSMENT.â 31 (b)âThe rules to establish uniform core curricula for each 32 state-approved teacher preparation program must include, but are 33 not limited to, the following: 34 1.âCandidate instruction and assessment in the Florida 35 Educator Accomplished Practices across content areas. 36 2.âThe use of state-adopted content standards to guide 37 curricula and instruction. 38 3.âScientifically researched and evidence-based reading 39 instructional strategies grounded in the science of reading 40 which improve reading performance for all students, including 41 explicit, systematic, and sequential approaches to teaching 42 phonemic awareness, phonics, vocabulary, fluency, and text 43 comprehension and multisensory intervention strategies. The 44 primary instructional strategy for teaching word reading is 45 phonics instruction for decoding and encoding. Instructional 46 strategies for foundational skills may not employ the three 47 cueing system model of reading or visual memory as a basis for 48 teaching word reading. Instructional strategies may include 49 visual information and strategies that improve background and 50 experiential knowledge, add context, and increase oral language 51 and vocabulary to support comprehension, but may not be used to 52 teach word reading. 53 4.âContent literacy and mathematics practices. 54 5.âStrategies appropriate for the instruction of English 55 language learners. 56 6.âStrategies appropriate for the instruction of students 57 with disabilities. 58 7.âStrategies to differentiate instruction based on student 59 needs. 60 8.âStrategies and practices to support evidence-based 61 content aligned to state standards and grading practices. 62 9.âStrategies appropriate for the early identification of a 63 student in crisis or experiencing a mental health challenge and 64 the referral of such student to a mental health professional for 65 support. 66 10.âStrategies to support the use of technology in 67 education and distance learning. 68 11.âStrategies and practices to support effective, 69 research-based assessment and grading practices aligned to the 70 stateâs academic standards. 71 12.âStrategies and practices for identifying, preventing, 72 preparing for, addressing, and responding to mass casualty 73 incidents. 74 Section 2.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (3) of 75 section 1004.85, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 76 1004.85âPostsecondary educator preparation institutes.â 77 (3)âEducator preparation institutes approved pursuant to 78 this section may offer competency-based certification programs 79 specifically designed for noneducation major baccalaureate 80 degree holders to enable program participants to meet the 81 educator certification requirements of s. 1012.56. An educator 82 preparation institute choosing to offer a competency-based 83 certification program pursuant to the provisions of this section 84 must implement a program developed by the institute and approved 85 by the department for this purpose. Approved programs shall be 86 available for use by other approved educator preparation 87 institutes. 88 (a)âWithin 90 days after receipt of a request for approval, 89 the Department of Education shall approve a preparation program 90 pursuant to the requirements of this subsection or issue a 91 statement of the deficiencies in the request for approval. The 92 department shall approve a certification program if the 93 institute provides evidence of the instituteâs capacity to 94 implement a competency-based program that instructs and assesses 95 each candidate in the following: 96 1.a.âThe Florida Educator Accomplished Practices approved 97 by the state board. 98 b.âThe state academic standards provided under s. 1003.41, 99 including scientifically based reading instruction, content 100 literacy, and mathematical practices, for each subject 101 identified on the statement of status of eligibility or the 102 temporary certificate. 103 c.âScientifically researched and evidence-based reading 104 instructional strategies grounded in the science of reading 105 which improve reading performance for all students, including 106 explicit, systematic, and sequential approaches to teaching 107 phonemic awareness, phonics, vocabulary, fluency, and text 108 comprehension and multisensory intervention strategies. The 109 primary instructional strategy for teaching word reading is 110 phonics instruction for decoding and encoding. Instructional 111 strategies for foundational skills may not employ the three 112 cueing system model of reading or visual memory as a basis for 113 teaching word reading. Instructional strategies may include 114 visual information and strategies which improve background and 115 experiential knowledge, add context, and increase oral language 116 and vocabulary to support comprehension, but may not be used to 117 teach word reading. 118 d.âStrategies and practices for identifying, preventing, 119 preparing for, addressing, and responding to mass casualty 120 incidents. 121 2.âAn educational plan for each participant to meet 122 certification requirements and demonstrate his or her ability to 123 teach the subject area for which the participant is seeking 124 certification, which is based on an assessment of his or her 125 competency in the areas listed in subparagraph 1. 126 3.âField experiences appropriate to the certification 127 subject area specified in the educational plan under the 128 supervision of qualified educators. The state board shall 129 determine in rule the amount of field experience necessary to 130 serve as the teacher of record, beginning with candidates 131 entering a program in the 2023-2024 school year. 132 4.âA certification ombudsman to facilitate the process and 133 procedures required for participants who complete the program to 134 meet any requirements related to the background screening 135 pursuant to s. 1012.32 and educator professional or temporary 136 certification pursuant to s. 1012.56. 137 (b)âEach program participant must: 138 1.âMeet certification requirements pursuant to s. 139 1012.56(1) by obtaining a statement of status of eligibility in 140 the certification subject area of the educational plan and meet 141 the requirements of s. 1012.56(2)(a)-(g) s. 1012.56(2)(a)-(f) 142 before participating in field experiences. 143 2.âDemonstrate competency and participate in field 144 experiences that are appropriate to his or her educational plan 145 prepared under paragraph (a). Beginning with candidates entering 146 an educator preparation institute in the 2022-2023 school year, 147 a candidate for certification in a coverage area identified 148 pursuant to s. 1012.585(3)(f) must successfully complete all 149 competencies for a reading endorsement, including completion of 150 the endorsement practicum through the candidateâs field 151 experience, in order to graduate from the program. 152 3.âBefore completion of the program, fully demonstrate his 153 or her ability to teach the subject area for which he or she is 154 seeking certification by documenting a positive impact on 155 student learning growth in a prekindergarten through grade 12 156 setting and, except as provided in s. 1012.56(7)(a)3., achieving 157 a passing score on the professional education competency 158 examination, the basic skills examination, and the subject area 159 examination for the subject area certification which is required 160 by state board rule. 161 Section 3.âPresent paragraphs (g), (h), and (i) of 162 subsection (2) of section 1012.56, Florida Statutes, are 163 redesignated as paragraphs (h), (i), and (j), respectively, a 164 new paragraph (g) is added to that subsection, and paragraphs 165 (a), (b), and (d) of subsection (7) of that section are amended, 166 to read: 167 1012.56âEducator certification requirements.â 168 (2)âELIGIBILITY CRITERIA.âTo be eligible to seek 169 certification, a person must: 170 (g)âHave received training that includes strategies and 171 practices for identifying, preventing, preparing for, 172 addressing, and responding to mass casualty incidents. 173 (7)âTYPES AND TERMS OF CERTIFICATION.â 174 (a)âThe Department of Education shall issue a professional 175 certificate for a period not to exceed 5 years to any applicant 176 who fulfills one of the following: 177 1.âMeets all the applicable requirements outlined in 178 subsection (2). 179 2.âFor a professional certificate covering grades 6 through 180 12: 181 a.âMeets the applicable requirements of paragraphs (2)(a) 182 (i) (2)(a)-(h). 183 b.âHolds a masterâs or higher degree in the area of 184 science, technology, engineering, or mathematics. 185 c.âTeaches a high school course in the subject of the 186 advanced degree. 187 d.âIs rated highly effective as determined by the teacherâs 188 performance evaluation under s. 1012.34, based in part on 189 student performance as measured by a statewide, standardized 190 assessment or an Advanced Placement, Advanced International 191 Certificate of Education, or International Baccalaureate 192 examination. 193 e.âAchieves a passing score on the Florida professional 194 education competency examination required by state board rule. 195 3.âMeets the applicable requirements of paragraphs (2)(a) 196 (i) (2)(a)-(h) and completes a professional learning 197 certification program approved by the department pursuant to 198 paragraph (8)(c) or an educator preparation institute approved 199 by the department pursuant to s. 1004.85. An applicant who 200 completes one of these programs and is rated highly effective as 201 determined by his or her performance evaluation under s. 1012.34 202 is not required to take or achieve a passing score on the 203 professional education competency examination in order to be 204 awarded a professional certificate. 205 (b)âThe department shall issue a temporary certificate to 206 any applicant who: 207 1.âCompletes the requirements outlined in paragraphs 208 (2)(a)-(g) (2)(a)-(f) and completes the subject area content 209 requirements specified in state board rule or demonstrates 210 mastery of subject area knowledge pursuant to subsection (5) and 211 holds an accredited degree or a degree approved by the 212 Department of Education at the level required for the subject 213 area specialization in state board rule; 214 2.âFor a subject area specialization for which the state 215 board otherwise requires a bachelorâs degree, documents 48 216 months of active-duty military service with an honorable 217 discharge or a medical separation; completes the requirements 218 outlined in paragraphs (2)(a), (b), and (d)-(g) (d)-(f); 219 completes the subject area content requirements specified in 220 state board rule or demonstrates mastery of subject area 221 knowledge pursuant to subsection (5); and documents completion 222 of 60 college credits with a minimum cumulative grade point 223 average of 2.5 on a 4.0 scale, as provided by one or more 224 accredited institutions of higher learning or a nonaccredited 225 institution of higher learning identified by the Department of 226 Education as having a quality program resulting in a bachelorâs 227 degree or higher; or 228 3.âIs enrolled in a state-approved teacher preparation 229 program under s. 1004.04; is actively completing the required 230 program field experience or internship at a public school; 231 completes the requirements outlined in paragraphs (2)(a), (b), 232 and (d)-(g) (d)-(f); completes the subject area content 233 requirements specified in state board rule or demonstrates 234 mastery of subject area knowledge pursuant to subsection (5); 235 and documents completion of 60 college credits with a minimum 236 cumulative grade point average of 2.5 on a 4.0 scale, as 237 provided by one or more accredited institutions of higher 238 learning or a nonaccredited institution of higher learning 239 identified by the Department of Education as having a quality 240 program resulting in a bachelorâs degree or higher. 241 (d)âThe department shall issue a temporary apprenticeship 242 certificate to any applicant who meets the requirements of 243 paragraphs (2)(a), (b), and (d)-(g) (d)-(f). 244 245 At least 1 year before an individualâs temporary certificate is 246 set to expire, the department shall electronically notify the 247 individual of the date on which his or her certificate will 248 expire and provide a list of each method by which the 249 qualifications for a professional certificate can be completed. 250 Section 4.âSection 1012.5841, Florida Statutes, is created 251 to read: 252 1012.5841âContinuing education and inservice training for 253 identifying, preventing, preparing for, addressing, and 254 responding to mass casualty incidents.â 255 (1)âThe Department of Education shall develop a list of 256 approved trainings to prepare instructional personnel to 257 identify, prevent, prepare for, address, and respond to mass 258 casualty incidents. 259 (2)âBeginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the 260 department shall incorporate the training included in the list 261 required under subsection (1) into existing requirements for the 262 continuing education or inservice training of instructional 263 personnel. The requirements of this section may not add to the 264 total hours required for continuing education or inservice 265 training as currently established by the department. 266 (3)âA person has no cause of action for any loss or damage 267 caused by an act or omission resulting from the implementation 268 of this section or resulting from any training required by this 269 section unless the loss or damage was caused by willful or 270 wanton misconduct. This section does not create any new duty of 271 care or basis of liability. 272 (4)âThe State Board of Education may adopt rules to 273 implement this section. 274 Section 5.âSubsections (5) and (6) of section 1012.55, 275 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 276 1012.55âPositions for which certificates required.â 277 (5)âA person who is employed as a school social worker is 278 exempt from the educator certification requirements in s. 279 1012.56(2)(h) and (i) s. 1012.56(2)(g) and (h) relating to the 280 mastery of general and subject area knowledge. 281 (6)âNotwithstanding this section and ss. 1012.32 and 282 1012.56, or any other provision of law or rule to the contrary, 283 the State Board of Education shall adopt rules to allow for the 284 issuance of a classical education teaching certificate, upon the 285 request of a classical school, to any applicant who fulfills the 286 requirements of s. 1012.56(2)(a)-(g) s. 1012.56(2)(a)-(f) and 287 (11) and any other criteria established by the department. Such 288 certificate is only valid at a classical school. For the 289 purposes of this subsection, the term âclassical schoolâ means a 290 school that implements and provides professional learning in a 291 classical education school model that emphasizes the development 292 of students in the principles of moral character and civic 293 virtue through a well-rounded education in the liberal arts and 294 sciences that is based on the classical trivium stages of 295 grammar, logic, and rhetoric. 296 Section 6.âSubsection (1) of section 1012.57, Florida 297 Statutes, is amended to read: 298 1012.57âCertification of adjunct educators.â 299 (1)âNotwithstanding the provisions of ss. 1012.32, 1012.55, 300 and 1012.56, or any other provision of law or rule to the 301 contrary, district school boards and charter school governing 302 boards shall adopt rules to allow for the issuance of an adjunct 303 teaching certificate to any applicant who fulfills the 304 requirements of s. 1012.56(2)(a)-(g) s. 1012.56(2)(a)-(f) and 305 (11) and who has expertise in the subject area to be taught. An 306 applicant is considered to have expertise in the subject area to 307 be taught if the applicant demonstrates sufficient subject area 308 mastery through passage of a subject area test or has achieved 309 an industry certification in the subject area to be taught. 310 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.